Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7535
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Property and Casualty Insurance Rate and Form Act. The rules and regulations shall not be effective prior to January 1, 2001.

Laws 2000, LB 1119, § 35.